Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 5
COUNTY HOUSING AUTHORITY

29-4-501. Legislative declaration.

It is hereby declared:

That there exists a housing shortage for agricultural workers, their families, and other families of low income in the state of Colorado with the result that many agricultural and other low income workers and their families are unable to find decent, safe, and sanitary housing;

That such condition constitutes a menace to the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of this state; and

That it is in the public interest to authorize the organization of county housing authorities to provide housing facilities for agricultural and other low income workers and their families.

The necessity in the public interest for the provisions enacted in this part 5 is declared a matter of legislative determination.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 444, § 1.

CSA:

C. 82, § 79.

CRS 53:

§ 69-6-1.

L. 61:

p. 422, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-6-1.

29-4-502. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authority" or "housing authority" means any of the county housing authorities created by this part 5.

"Board" means the board of county commissioners of any county.

"County" means any county within the state of Colorado.

"Federal government" means the United States, the federal emergency administrator of public works, or any other agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States.

"Project" means all real and personal property, buildings and improvements, stores, offices, lands for farming and gardening, commercial facilities, and community facilities acquired or constructed or to be acquired or constructed pursuant to a single plan or undertaking, to demolish, clear, remove, alter, or repair unsanitary or unsafe housing or to provide dwelling accommodations on financial terms within the means of persons of low income. The term "project" also applies to the planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property, the demolition of existing structures, the construction, reconstruction, alteration, and repair of the improvements, and all other work in connection therewith. The term "project" also applies to the provision of dwelling accommodations to persons, without regard to income, as long as the project substantially benefits persons of low income as determined by an authority.

"State" means the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 444, § 2.

CSA:

C. 82, § 80.

CRS 53:

§ 69-6-2.

L. 61:

p. 422, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-6-2.

L. 2002:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 1937, § 2, effective June 7.

29-4-503. Creation of housing authority.

Any twenty-five residents of the county may file a petition with the clerk of the board of county commissioners setting forth that there is a need for an authority to function in the county. Upon the filing of such petition, the clerk of the board shall give notice of the time, place, and purpose of a public hearing at which the board will determine the need for such an authority in the county. Such notice shall be given at the county's expense by publishing a notice at least ten days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county or, if there is no newspaper, by posting such notice in at least three public places within the county at least ten days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held.

Upon the date fixed for said hearing, held upon notice as provided in this section, a full opportunity to be heard shall be granted to all residents and taxpayers of the county and to all other interested persons. After such a hearing, the board shall determine whether there is a shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations in the county available to persons engaged in agricultural work, their families, and other low income families. If the board determines that such condition of shortage exists, the board shall adopt a resolution so finding and shall cause notice of such determination to be given to the chairman of the board, who shall thereupon appoint commissioners, as provided in either subsection (2) or (3) of section 29-4-504, to act as an authority. A certificate signed by such commissioners so appointed by the chairman of the board shall then be filed with the division of local government in the department of local affairs, and there remain of record, setting forth that a notice has been given and a public hearing has been held as aforesaid; that the board made a determination of such shortage after such hearing; and that the chairman of the board has appointed them as commissioners to act as an authority. Upon the filing of such certificate with said division, the commissioners and their successors shall constitute a housing authority, which shall be a body corporate and politic.

If the board, after a hearing, determines that there is not a shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations in the county available to persons engaged in agricultural work, to their families, and to other families of low income, it shall adopt a resolution denying the petition. After three months have expired from the denial of the petition, subsequent petitions may be filed and new hearings and determinations made thereon.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of any contract, mortgage, trust indenture, or other agreement of the authority or involving any action taken by the authority, the authority shall be conclusively deemed to have been established in accordance with the provisions of this part 5 upon proof of the filing of the aforesaid certificate. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the director of the division of local government, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action, or proceeding and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and the contents thereof.

If the board of county commissioners denies any petition filed for the creation of a housing authority in accordance with the provisions of subsection (3) of this section and the residents of such county determine that there is in fact a shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations in the county, a petition may be filed with the board requesting that the question of the approval or disapproval of creating a housing authority be submitted to a vote of the qualified electors of such county. If the petition, which may consist of one or more separate copies, contains the signatures and residence addresses of qualified electors of such county equal in number to not less than five percent of the votes cast for governor or for president and vice president of the United States at the last preceding general election held within such county, the board shall cause the question of the creation of a housing authority to be submitted at the next general election. All registered electors within the county shall be eligible to vote on the question, which shall be conducted, insofar as possible, in accordance with the provisions of sections 29-4-604 to 29-4-607; except that the question to be voted on shall be the creation of a housing authority, and the provisions of the "Uniform Election Code of 1992" shall apply.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 445, § 3.

CSA:

C. 82, § 81.

CRS 53:

§ 69-6-3.

L. 61:

p. 423, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-6-3.

L. 65:

p. 728, § 3.

L. 73:

p. 800, § 2.

L. 76:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 597, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(5) amended, p. 410, § 16, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

(5) amended, p. 873, § 100, effective January 1, 1993.

Cross references:

For the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", see articles 1 to 13 of title 1.

29-4-504. Appointment of commissioners.

The authority shall consist of commissioners appointed by the board in the manner provided in either subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

The board may provide that the members of the board shall ex officio be appointed the commissioners of the authority. The terms of office of such commissioners shall be coterminous with their terms of office on the board. The chairman of the board shall ex officio be chairman of the commissioners, and the commissioners shall select from their members a vice-chairman.

The board may provide that an authority shall consist of no more than eleven commissioners appointed by the chairman of the board, who shall designate the first chairman. Not more than one of such commissioners may be a county official. In the event that a county official is appointed as a commissioner of an authority, acceptance or retention of such appointment shall not be deemed a forfeiture of his or her office, or incompatible therewith, or affect his or her tenure or compensation in any way. The term of office of a commissioner of an authority who is a county official shall not be affected or curtailed by the expiration of the term of his or her county office.

The commissioners who are appointed under the provisions of this subsection (3) shall be designated by the chairman of the board to serve for terms that are staggered from the date of their appointment such that, to the extent possible, the terms of an equal number of commissioners end each year. Thereafter, the term of office shall be five years. A commissioner shall hold office until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified. Vacancies other than by reason of expiration of terms shall be filled for the unexpired term. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum. The chairman of the board shall file with the county clerk and recorder a certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner, and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner. The authority shall select from its members a vice-chairman and a chairman when the office of the first chairman becomes vacant.

(3.5) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, commencing on and after August 2, 2000, as new appointments are made to authorities pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, such appointments shall be made so that not less than one commissioner of each authority shall be an individual who is directly assisted by the authority and who may, if provided in a plan of the authority, be elected by individuals directly assisted by the authority. This subsection (3.5) shall not apply to any authority with fewer than three hundred public housing units if the authority provides reasonable notice to the resident advisory board of the opportunity for not less than one individual to serve as a commissioner of the authority as provided in this subsection (3.5) and, within a reasonable time after receipt by such board of the notice, the authority is not notified of the intention of any such individual to serve as a commissioner.

A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his official duties.

An authority may employ a secretary who shall be executive director, technical experts, and such other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. An authority may call upon the corporation counsel or county attorney for such legal services as it may require, or it may employ its own counsel and legal staff. An authority may delegate to one or more of its agents or employees such powers or duties as it may deem proper.

The board may, by resolution, change the method of appointment of commissioners after a proper notice and hearing, and set a date for the changed method to become effective.

No commissioner or employee of an authority shall acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any project or in any property included or planned to be in any project, nor shall he have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or used in connection with any project. If any commissioner or employee of an authority owns or controls an interest, direct or indirect, in any property included or planned to be included in any project, he shall immediately disclose the same in writing to the authority, and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority. Failure to so disclose such interest shall constitute misconduct in office. Upon disclosure such commissioner or employee shall not be allowed to participate in any action by the authority for acquisition of such property or making such contract.

For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner of an authority may be removed by the board, but only after a hearing and after he has been given a copy of the charges at least ten days prior to such hearing and an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. In the event of the removal of any commissioner, a record of the proceedings together with the charges and findings thereon shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the board.

The terms of office of present commissioners of authorities created under this section shall expire July 1, 1973. Prior to such date, the board shall appoint new commissioners, as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, such appointments to be effective July 1, 1973.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 447, § 4.

CSA:

C. 82, § 82.

CRS 53:

§ 69-6-4.

L. 61:

p. 425, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-6-4.

L. 73:

p. 801, § 3.

L. 95:

(5) amended, p. 1105, § 44, effective May 31.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 130, § 4, effective March 24.

L. 2000:

(3.5) added, p. 881, § 5, effective August 2.

29-4-505. Powers of authority.

A housing authority shall constitute a public body, corporate and politic, exercise public and essential governmental functions, and have all the powers necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this part 5 (but not the power to levy and collect taxes or special assessments), including the following powers:

To sue and be sued;

To have a seal and to alter the same at pleasure;

To have perpetual succession;

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority;

To make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules, and regulations not inconsistent with this part 5 to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority;

To exercise any of the public powers granted to city housing authorities under part 2 of this article;

To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers given in this part 5 or the purposes hereof.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 448, § 5.

CSA:

C. 82, § 83.

CRS 53:

§ 69-6-5.

L. 61:

p. 426, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-6-5.

29-4-506. Policy of authority.

It is declared to be the policy of this state that each authority shall manage and operate its projects in an efficient manner so as to enable it to fix the rentals or payments for dwelling accommodations at low rates consistent with providing adequate dwelling accommodations for persons of low income.

To this end the authority shall fix the rentals or payments for dwellings in its projects at no higher rates than it finds to be necessary in order to produce revenues which, together with all other available moneys, revenues, income, and receipts of the authority from whatever sources derived including federal financial assistance necessary to maintain the low rent character of the projects, will be sufficient to cover:

Reasonable and proper costs of management, operation, maintenance, and improvement of the projects;

Payments in lieu of taxes as it determines are consistent with the maintenance of the low rent character of projects;

The establishment of reasonable and proper reserves; and

The payment of currently maturing installments of principal and interest on any indebtedness incurred in connection with the project by the authority.

Rentals or payments for dwellings shall be established and the projects administered, insofar as possible, so as to assure that any federal financial assistance required shall be strictly limited to amounts and periods necessary to maintain the low rent character of the projects. In the operation or management of a project, the authority may enter into any agreement with the federal government respecting tenant eligibility.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 449, § 6.

CSA:

C. 82, § 84.

CRS 53:

§ 69-6-6.

L. 61:

p. 427, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-6-6.

29-4-507. Exemption from special assessments - tax exemptions.

The authority and the property of the authority is exempt from all taxes and special assessments on the same basis and subject to the same conditions as provided for city housing authorities in sections 29-4-226 and 29-4-227. Like a city housing authority, an authority may voluntarily apply to include eligible real property, as defined in section 32-20-103 (4), in which it has an interest as described in section 29-4-226 (2) into the boundaries of the Colorado new energy improvement district created in section 32-20-104 (1) and may accept the levying by the district of a special assessment, as defined in section 32-20-103 (14), against the eligible real property. In lieu of taxes on its property, the authority may agree to make such annual payments to the taxing bodies in which the projects are situated as it finds consistent with the maintenance of the low rent character of the projects or the achievement of the purposes of this part 5.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 449, § 7.

CSA:

C. 82, § 85.

CRS 53:

§ 69-6-7.

L. 61:

p. 428, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-6-7.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1938, § 3, effective June 7.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1272), ch. 358, p. 3289, § 4, effective August 2.

29-4-508. Boundaries of authority.

The boundaries of such authority shall be the boundaries of the county, but in no event shall they include the whole or a part of any city unless the governing body of said city passes a resolution authorizing the inclusion of said city within the boundaries of such authority nor may it include any area within the county which at the time of the organization of such housing authority was included within the boundaries of a housing authority previously established under part 2 of this article; but nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent the organization of a housing authority subsequently established by any such city embracing any area within the county exclusive of the area of any project owned or operated by an authority organized under this part 5.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 449, § 8.

CSA:

C. 82, § 86.

CRS 53:

§ 69-6-8.

L. 61:

p. 428, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-6-8.

29-4-509. Conformity with building laws.

All projects of an authority shall be subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary, and building laws, ordinances, and regulations applicable to the locality in which the project is situated.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 450, § 9.

CSA:

C. 82, § 87.

CRS 53:

§ 69-6-9.

L. 61:

p. 429, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-6-9.

Cross references:

For county planning and building codes, see article 28 of title 30; for municipal zoning restrictions, see part 3 of article 23 of title 31.